Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201821-2,101
Submission of matters for shareholder
vote.

(MBCA
8.26) A corporation may agree to submit a matter to a vote of its shareholders
even if, after approving the matter, the board of directors determines it
no longer recommends the matter.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 101.